Indiana, session 2026, SB283.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-28-6-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 69, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) Subject to subsection (c), the aggregate
amount of applicable tax credits that the corporation may certify
(1) for each state fiscal year ending on or before June 30, 2025,
for all taxpayers is two hundred fifty million dollars
($250,000,000); and
(2) for each state fiscal year ending on or after July 1, 2025, for all
taxpayers is three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000), of
which fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be awarded as
required under IC 6-3.1-34-16(b). Each certification under this
subdivision initial tax credit award is subject to budget
committee review.
(b) For purposes of determining the amount of applicable tax credits
that have been certified for a state fiscal year, the following apply:
(1) An applicable tax credit is considered awarded in the state
fiscal year in which the taxpayer can first claim the credit,
2026 IN 283—LS 7100/DI 120


determined without regard to any carryforward period or
carryback period.
(2) An applicable tax credit awarded by the corporation before
July 1, 2022, shall be counted toward the aggregate credit
limitation under this section.
(3) If an accelerated credit is awarded under IC 6-3.1-26-15, the
amount counted toward the aggregate credit limitation under this
section for a state fiscal year shall be the amount of the credit for
the taxable year described in subdivision (1) prior to any discount.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (a), if the corporation determines
that:
(1) an applicable tax credit should be certified in a state fiscal
year; and
(2) certification of the applicable tax credit will result in an
aggregate amount of applicable tax credits certified for that state
fiscal year that exceeds the maximum amount provided in
subsection (a);
the corporation may, after review by the budget committee, certify the
applicable tax credit to the taxpayer.
(d) This section expires December 31, 2032.
SECTION 2. IC 6-3.1-34-2.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. As used in this chapter,
"development authority" refers to a regional development
authority established under IC 36-7.5-2-1, IC 36-7.6-2-3, or
IC 36-7.7-3-1.
SECTION 3. IC 6-3.1-34-2.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.2. As used in this chapter,
"development plan" refers to a comprehensive strategic
development plan approved by the development authority for its
jurisdiction and which outlines its economic development strategy,
the anticipated local resource commitments, the proposed
regionally significant projects, the return on investment analysis
reflecting a positive state return for such projects, the requirement
that an equal or greater level of local public financial participation
in the aggregate across all projects, the requirement that projects
are reasonably expected to spur a total investment across all
projects that is four (4) times greater than the level of the state
resources provided on a present value basis, and that each project
supported would not occur but for the provision of the requested
state resources.
2026 IN 283—LS 7100/DI 120


SECTION 4. IC 6-3.1-34-8.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. As used in this chapter,
"rural development site" is a qualified redevelopment site that is
located in a county with a population of less than fifty thousand
(50,000).
SECTION 5. IC 6-3.1-34-15, AS ADDED BY P.L.158-2019,
SECTION 29, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) To be awarded a credit under this chapter,
a taxpayer must file an application with the corporation and enter into
an agreement with the corporation as set forth under this chapter.
(b) To be awarded a credit under section 16(b) of this chapter,
a development authority may submit an application for a qualified
redevelopment site described in the development authority's
development plan to the corporation for approval in the manner
specified by the corporation.
SECTION 6. IC 6-3.1-34-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.135-2022,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) The corporation shall consider the
following factors in deciding whether to award a credit under this
chapter for a proposed qualified investment:
(1) Evidence that the project aligns with the community's
development plans.
(2) The economic development potential for the project for which
the taxpayer proposes to make the qualified investment.
(3) Evidence of barriers preventing the development or
redevelopment of the qualified redevelopment site in which the
qualified investment is made, such as significant environmental
contamination requiring remediation.
(4) The level of commitment by the public sector and local
government to assist in the financing of improvements or
redevelopment activities benefiting the qualified redevelopment
site in which the qualified investment is made.
(5) Evidence of support by residents, businesses, and private
organizations in the surrounding community for the project for
which the taxpayer proposes to make the qualified investment.
(6) The level of economic distress in the surrounding community
and the extent to which the project for which the taxpayer
proposes to make the qualified investment mitigates the economic
distress.
(7) The extent to which the project is estimated to enhance the
economic opportunity, health, safety, aesthetics, or amenities of
2026 IN 283—LS 7100/DI 120


the community in a manner that:
(A) improves quality of life factors for residents of the region;
and
(B) increases the ability of the region to attract and retain a
talented workforce.
(8) Any other factors as determined by the corporation.
(b) The corporation shall award fifty million dollars
($50,000,000) in credits each state fiscal year to development
authorities with an approved application for a qualified
redevelopment site described in their development plans by the
corporation in accordance with section 15(b) of this chapter. Tax
credits shall be awarded among the development authorities based
upon population, except at least twenty percent (20%) of all
awards each year shall be allocated to a rural development site.
SECTION 7. IC 6-3.1-34-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.135-2022,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) The following apply if the corporation
determines that a credit should be awarded under this chapter:
(1) The corporation shall require the taxpayer, or the
redevelopment authority for awards under section 16(b) of
this chapter, to enter into an agreement with the corporation as
a condition of receiving a credit under this chapter.
(2) The agreement with the corporation must:
(A) prescribe the method of certifying the taxpayer's qualified
investment, or redevelopment authority's approved
qualified redevelopment site for awards under section
16(b) of this chapter; and
(B) include provisions that authorize the corporation to work
with the department and the taxpayer, if the corporation
determines that the taxpayer is noncompliant with the terms of
the agreement or the provisions of this chapter, to bring the
taxpayer into compliance or to protect the interests of the state.
(3) The corporation shall specify the taxpayer's expenditures that
will be considered a qualified investment, or redevelopment
authority's approved qualified redevelopment site for awards
under section 16(b) of this chapter.
(4) The corporation shall determine the applicable credit
percentage under subsections (b) and (c).
(b) If the corporation determines that a credit should be awarded
under section 16(a) of this chapter, the corporation shall determine the
applicable credit percentage for a qualified investment certified by the
corporation. However, and except as provided in subsection (c), the
2026 IN 283—LS 7100/DI 120


applicable credit percentage may not exceed thirty percent (30%).
(c) For awards under section 16(a) of this chapter, the
corporation may increase the credit amount by not more than an
additional five percent (5%) if:
(1) the qualified redevelopment site is located in a federally
designated qualified opportunity zone (Section 1400Z-1 and
1400Z-2 of the Internal Revenue Code); or
(2) the project qualifies for federal new markets tax credits under
Section 45D of the Internal Revenue Code.
(d) To be eligible for the credit under section 16(a) of this chapter
for a qualified investment, a taxpayer's expenditures that are considered
a qualified investment must be certified by the corporation not later
than two (2) taxable years after the end of the calendar year in which
the taxpayer's expenditures are made.
SECTION 8. IC 6-3.1-34-18, AS AMENDED BY P.L.201-2023,
SECTION 102, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), if the corporation awards a tax credit to a taxpayer
under section 16(a) of this chapter that exceeds twenty million dollars
($20,000,000), the corporation shall include in an agreement entered
into under section 17 of this chapter a provision that requires the
taxpayer to repay to the corporation the portion of the credit that
exceeds twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) with interest.
Notwithstanding the date on which a tax credit is awarded under this
chapter, any repayment of any part of a credit awarded under this
chapter shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the corporation may exclude
from its agreement entered into under section 17 of this chapter a
repayment provision for any portion of the credit if the award is for a
qualified redevelopment site subject to a proposal that will result in a
qualified investment of at least one hundred million dollars
($100,000,000).
(c) If the corporation enters into an agreement with a taxpayer under
section 17 of this chapter that includes a repayment provision under
subsection (a), the corporation shall include in the repayment provision
a provision establishing the interest rate that will be applied. The
interest rate shall be determined by the board and approved by the
budget agency.
(d) This subsection applies to an active multi-phased project
occurring on a defined footprint for which the taxpayer has received
approval for at least the first phase of the active multi-phased project
from the corporation's board before July 1, 2018, for a tax credit under
2026 IN 283—LS 7100/DI 120


IC 6-3.1-11 (industrial recovery tax credit) before its expiration. The
following apply to a project described in this subsection:
(1) Only qualified investments that are made after June 30, 2021,
are eligible for a credit award under this chapter.
(2) The annual amount of credits awarded under this chapter for
the project may not exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000).
(3) The corporation may not include a repayment provision as part
of an agreement entered into under section 17 of this chapter for
the credits awarded for the project.
(e) The part of any credit that is subject to a repayment provision
under this section must be included in the calculation of the aggregate
amount of applicable tax credits that the corporation may certify for a
state fiscal year under IC 5-28-6-9.
SECTION 9. IC 36-7.6-2-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.178-2015,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A development authority may be established
by any of the following:
(1) One (1) or more counties and one (1) or more adjacent
counties.
(2) One (1) or more counties and one (1) or more qualified cities
in adjacent counties.
(3) One (1) or more qualified cities and one (1) or more qualified
cities in adjacent counties.
(b) A county or qualified city may participate in the establishment
of a development authority under this section and become a member of
the development authority only if the fiscal body of the county or
qualified city adopts an ordinance authorizing the county or qualified
city to participate in the establishment of the development authority.
For a county or city that is currently participating in a
development authority, the fiscal body of the county or qualified
city may adopt a subsequent ordinance authorizing the county or
qualified city to change membership and instead participate in a
new or different development authority.
(c) When a county establishes a development authority with another
unit as provided in this chapter, each qualified city and third class city
in the county also becomes a member of the development authority,
without further action by the qualified city, the third class city, or the
development authority.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a county or
municipality may be a member of only one (1) development authority.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a county or
municipality that is a member of the northwest Indiana regional
2026 IN 283—LS 7100/DI 120


development authority under IC 36-7.5 may not be a member of a
development authority under this article.
(f) A development authority shall notify the Indiana economic
development corporation in writing promptly after the development
authority is established, or if membership of the development
authority changes.
2026 IN 283—LS 7100/DI 120